Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1416
Indictment; how found; endorsement; no true bill; effect.

(1) At least twelve of the grand jurors must concur in the finding of an indictment; when so found the foreman shall endorse on such indictment the words A true bill, and subscribe his or her name thereto as foreman.

(2) Once a grand jury has returned a no true bill based upon a transaction, set of transactions, event, or events, a grand jury inquiry into the same transaction or events shall not be initiated unless the court finds, upon a proper showing by the prosecuting attorney, that the prosecuting attorney has discovered additional evidence relevant to such inquiry.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 408, p. 816;

R.S.1913, § 9046;

C.S.1922, § 10070;

C.S.1929, § 29-1416;

R.S.1943, § 29-1416;

Laws 1979, LB 524, § 9.

Indictment must be endorsed and endorsement subscribed by foreman. Goldsberry v. State, 92 Neb. 211, 137 N.W. 1116 (1912).